test/src/dict-gt-yamls/dicttests_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-dict-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-dict-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# Tag tests:

  v1-v2 - elkie:
    elkie+v1+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen: elkien
    elkie+v2+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen: eelkien
    elkie+N+v2+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Gen: ~eelkien

  v3-v4 - dåakterekontovre:
    dåakterekontovre+v3+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Gen: dåkterekontovren
    dåakterekontovre+v4+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Gen: dakterekontovren
    dåakterekontovre+N+v4+Sem/Build+Sg+Gen: ~dakterekontovren

# Sem tags for Prop:
  Sem/Sur - Risten:
    Risten+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Ristenen

  Sem/Plc - Romsa:
    Romsa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Romsan

  Sem/Hum - ipmil: # No tag here:
    jupmele+N+Sem/Hum+Sg+Gen: jupmelen
